Washington statutes.
RCW 2.64.070

Refusal to obey subpoena—Powers of superior court.

If a person refuses to obey a subpoena issued by the commission or refuses to answer any proper question during a hearing or proceeding, the superior court of any county in which the hearing or proceeding is conducted or in which the person resides or is found shall have jurisdiction, upon application by the commission, to order the person to appear before the commission, to produce evidence if so ordered, or to give testimony concerning the matter under investigation. Failure to obey the order of the court may be punished as contempt.

[ 1981 c 268 s 8.]